Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1747
Expulsion of members.

(1) Any member may be expelled by a two-thirds vote of the members present at any regular meeting or a special meeting called to consider the matter, but only after an opportunity has been given to the member to be heard.

(2) The board of directors may expel a member pursuant to a written policy adopted by it. All members shall be given written notice of the terms of any such policy. Any person expelled by the board shall have the right, within thirty calendar days, to request a hearing before it to reconsider the expulsion. The board of directors shall schedule the requested hearing within sixty calendar days after the request.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 47.